Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,162
Fees; penalties; distribution.

Any money collected under sections 81-5,158 to 81-5,160 shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the State Fire Marshal Cash Fund. Any civil penalties collected under section 81-5,163 shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the permanent school fund.

Laws 1997, LB 636, § 5.